src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!#####
!#Major POS's
!#####

LEXICON VERBS  !this is looking like a gateway, but not so labeled, affixes will need to be edited too
@D.Person.3@   VAI_GET ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
@D.Person@      VII_GET ;
                TRANS_GET ;

LEXICON VAI_GET
    VAI_DEF ;
    VAI_N ;
    VAI_V ;
    VAI_VV ;

LEXICON VII_GET
+VII:0    VII_ORDERS ;

LEXICON VII_ORDERS
# ; !not done yet

LEXICON TRANS_GET
    VTA_DEF ;
    VTA_AW ;
    VTA_C ;
    VTA_CW ;
    VTA_IZHI ;
    VTA_S ;




LEXICON VAI_DEF
agaasitawage    VAI_TAG    "has small ears" ; !line:11882, word:w72499171550w, sense:s72499172225s


LEXICON VAI_AM
bagakendam    VAI_TAG    "be clear-headed" ; !line:1707, word:w1491w, sense:s68908751532s
gopa'am    VAI_TAG    "loads upstream" ; !line:5115, word:w4581w, sense:s68908754652s
ina'am    VAI_TAG    "sings in such a way" ; !line:5351, word:w70118977355w, sense:s70118978050s
jiiwetam    VAI_TAG    "hears a high ringing in s.o.'s ear" ; !line:5930, word:w5286w, sense:s68908755374s
zaagewa'am    VAI_TAG    "emerges, comes into view (in a boat or canoe)" ; !line:10362, word:w70138969545w, sense:s70138972128s
biidwewidam    VAI_TAG    "come audibly, come making noise, come speaking" ; !line:12140, word:w74653256991w, sense:s74653258469s


LEXICON VAI_TAG
+VAI:0       VAI_ORDERS ;

LEXICON VTA_DEF
misawi    VTA_TAG    "make sure s.o. never does such a thing again and learns one's lesson" ; !line:7138, word:w6394w, sense:s68908756491s
aabiziiwim    VTA_TAG    "console s.o., solace s.o., encourage s.o." ; !line:11196, word:w72327519126w, sense:s72327520996s
wawiigi'    VTA_TAG    "be kind to s.o., be pleasant with s.o." ; !line:12118, word:w74648453072w, sense:s74648454730s
daadaadaganaabam    VTA_TAG    "gaze at s.o. ??" ; !line:12157, word:w74662913388w, sense:s74662914147s


LEXICON VTA_IZHI
izhi    VTA_TAG    "mean s.o." ; !line:5654, word:w5035w, sense:s68908755118s
izhi    VTA_TAG    "say to s.o." ; !line:5655, word:w5036w, sense:s70112174123s
maji-izhi    VTA_TAG    "speak ill of s.o." ; !line:6305, word:w70142678929w, sense:s70142679375s


LEXICON VTA_S
ashi    VTA_TAG    "place s.o. at such a place" ; !line:1138, word:w991w, sense:s68908751024s
giigashi    VTA_TAG    "place s.o. against something else like a wall" ; !line:4541, word:w4064w, sense:s68908754131s
goshi    VTA_TAG    "fear s.o., be afraid of s.o." ; !line:5123, word:w70112503908w, sense:s70112504519s
mawadish    VTA_TAG    "visit s.o." ; !line:6583, word:w5882w, sense:s68908755975s
nana'ishi    VTA_TAG    "settle s.o." ; !line:7799, word:w6999w, sense:s68908757098s
nishi    VTA_TAG    "kill s.o." ; !line:8459, word:w7515w, sense:s68908757676s
odishi    VTA_TAG    "reach s.o., arrive at s.o." ; !line:8809, word:w7826w, sense:s68908757991s

LEXICON VTA_TAG
+VTA:0     VTA_PREORDER_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_PREORDER_GET
        VTA_INDEP_THEME_GET ;
@D.Person@ VTA_NON_INDEP_GET ;

LEXICON VAI_N
bitaakoshin    VAI_TAG    "meets an obstacle accidentally, suddenly and is stopped; bumps against something accidentally" ; !line:2931, word:w2616w, sense:s68908752668s
madwezideshin    VAI_TAG    "has one's feet be heard" ; !line:6264, word:w5589w, sense:s68908755681s
bizaanishin    VAI_TAG    "has a quiet time, has an easy time of it (healthwise)" ; !line:11988, word:w72550500297w, sense:s72550501617s
LEXICON VAI_V
agomo    VAI_TAG    "floats still on the water" ; !line:557, word:w482w, sense:s68908750507s
apenimo    VAI_TAG    "relies on something, depends on something" ; !line:1043, word:w907w, sense:s68908750938s
baangwaabikizo    VAI_TAG    "has the water boil dry in the pot" ; !line:1434, word:w1243w, sense:s68908751284s
bakinezo    VAI_TAG    "ignites from a spark, catches on fire from a spark" ; !line:1847, word:w9993w, sense:s68908751664s
bii'o    VAI_TAG    "waits" ; !line:2298, word:w2030w, sense:s68908752077s
bimijigaabawi    VAI_TAG    "stands sideways" ; !line:2772, word:w2466w, sense:s68908752518s
dakimanji'o    VAI_TAG    "feels cold, has a sense of feeling cold" ; !line:3272, word:w2930w, sense:s68908752986s
gaagiigido    VAI_TAG    "talks at length" ; !line:3876, word:w3460w, sense:s68908753521s
gibwaakodozo    VAI_TAG    "is gummed shut" ; !line:4384, word:w3927w, sense:s68908753989s
gisikawabi    VAI_TAG    "sits up without being propped up" ; !line:4910, word:w4405w, sense:s68908754473s
gwenawi-ikido    VAI_TAG    "is speechless, cannot think of anything to say" ; !line:5284, word:w4738w, sense:s68908754811s
izhigozi    VAI_TAG    "moves (residence) to such a location" ; !line:5687, word:w5064w, sense:s68908755148s
madwewaajiwanzo    VAI_TAG    "is heard boiling" ; !line:6252, word:w5578w, sense:s68908755670s
miishiijiiminaadizi    VAI_TAG    "always tries to be first" ; !line:6869, word:w6149w, sense:s68908756243s
moowiwi    VAI_TAG    "is smeared with feces" ; !line:7398, word:w6631w, sense:s68908756729s
niibawikizo    VAI_TAG    "stands up on hind legs" ; !line:8035, word:w7198w, sense:s68908757302s
nookijiisagizi    VAI_TAG    "has soft rotten wood" ; !line:8631, word:w7659w, sense:s68908757831s
oniijaanisi    VAI_TAG    "has a child; is pregnant" ; !line:9188, word:w8188w, sense:s68908758336s
waagabi    VAI_TAG    "sits with a curved back" ; !line:9689, word:w8665w, sense:s68908758801s
zhaabwaatezi    VAI_TAG    "is transparent" ; !line:10632, word:w9512w, sense:s68908759648s
agadendaagozi    VAI_TAG    "conducts oneself in a shameful way, is considered shameful, is dishonourable, is despisable" ; !line:11897, word:w72503299759w, sense:s72503308481s
LEXICON VAI_VV
andawishkwe    VAI_TAG    "searches for medicinal plants" ; !line:822, word:w713w, sense:s68908750744s
atwaage    VAI_TAG    "gambles" ; !line:1205, word:w1049w, sense:s68908751083s
baazigobise    VAI_TAG    "is scratched accidentally and bleeds a little" ; !line:1579, word:w1374w, sense:s68908751415s
bekaabaawe    VAI_TAG    "is washed clean" ; !line:2135, word:w1886w, sense:s68908751930s
bimise    VAI_TAG    "flies by, flies along" ; !line:2788, word:w2480w, sense:s68908752532s
debashkine    VAI_TAG    "is full after a meal" ; !line:3475, word:w3112w, sense:s68908753170s
gibisangajii    VAI_TAG    "has constipation" ; !line:4354, word:w3898w, sense:s68908753960s
giziibiigizide    VAI_TAG    "washes one's feet" ; !line:5028, word:w4512w, sense:s68908754580s
jiibodoonetaa    VAI_TAG    "purses one's lips" ; !line:5840, word:w5203w, sense:s68908755291s
mamigadoweyaanikwe    VAI_TAG    "has fluffy hair" ; !line:6431, word:w5742w, sense:s68908755835s
minowane    VAI_TAG    "carries one's load well" ; !line:7063, word:w6325w, sense:s68908756424s
nabanegaade    VAI_TAG    "is one-legged" ; !line:7709, word:w6916w, sense:s68908757015s
nooji'iwe    VAI_TAG    "shows extreme interest in someone by spending time with, woos" ; !line:8602, word:w7631w, sense:s68908757803s
waabasimoo-ataage    VAI_TAG    "plays the 'white dog' gambling game" ; !line:9615, word:w8597w, sense:s68908758731s
zhaabobii    VAI_TAG    "is soaked right through" ; !line:10592, word:w9473w, sense:s68908759608s
giishkaabaagwe    VAI_TAG    "is thirsty" ; !line:11844, word:w72496290373w, sense:s72496291009s
LEXICON VTA_AW
andotaw    VTA_TAG    "listen for s.o." ; !line:849, word:w739w, sense:s68908750770s
bakite'igetamaw    VTA_TAG    "hit for s.o." ; !line:1859, word:w1632w, sense:s68908751675s
bisikaw    VTA_TAG    "put s.o. on; wear s.o." ; !line:2902, word:w2587w, sense:s68908752639s
debwetaw    VTA_TAG    "believe s.o." ; !line:3513, word:w3146w, sense:s68908753204s
gawishkaw    VTA_TAG    "make s.o. lie down horizontally with one's body" ; !line:4256, word:w3807w, sense:s68908753869s
gwanabishkaw    VTA_TAG    "make s.o.'s boat tip over by movement" ; !line:5203, word:w4663w, sense:s68908754735s
izhiweba'amaw    VTA_TAG    "thrust it to such a direction for s.o. else" ; !line:5739, word:w5109w, sense:s68908755196s
mashkikiikandaw    VTA_TAG    "brew a medicine for s.o." ; !line:6565, word:w5864w, sense:s68908755957s
misawinaw    VTA_TAG    "look at s.o. and want s.o." ; !line:7140, word:w6396w, sense:s68908756493s
nagishkaw    VTA_TAG    "meet s.o." ; !line:7749, word:w6954w, sense:s68908757053s
noondaw    VTA_TAG    "hear s.o." ; !line:8666, word:w7690w, sense:s68908757863s
waawaata'amaw    VTA_TAG    "wave at s.o." ; !line:9856, word:w8815w, sense:s68908758951s
ziinjishkaw    VTA_TAG    "wear s.o. (clothing) tightly" ; !line:11046, word:w9904w, sense:s68908760042s
LEXICON VTA_C
aanji'    VTA_TAG    "change s.o." ; !line:273, word:w230w, sense:s68908750252s
andon    VTA_TAG    "search for s.o. in a container" ; !line:833, word:w724w, sense:s68908750755s
baashkijiin    VTA_TAG    "squeeze s.o. in one's hand till s.o. bursts" ; !line:1493, word:w1297w, sense:s68908751338s
bapaabam    VTA_TAG    "look at s.o. through the window" ; !line:1975, word:w1747w, sense:s68908751791s
bimose'i    VTA_TAG    "cause s.o. to walk" ; !line:2810, word:w2501w, sense:s68908752553s
dadebi'    VTA_TAG    "greatly satisfy s.o." ; !line:3208, word:w2873w, sense:s68908752927s
ditibishkwemagin    VTA_TAG    "wrap s.o. up in birchbark" ; !line:3704, word:w3317w, sense:s68908753375s
gibichiwebin    VTA_TAG    "stop s.o. that is moving fast" ; !line:4339, word:w3883w, sense:s68908753945s
gizhii'aabikin    VTA_TAG    "turn s.o. on high, turn s.o. on fast" ; !line:4978, word:w4464w, sense:s68908754532s
inaasamin    VTA_TAG    "hold s.o. facing such a direction" ; !line:5408, word:w4837w, sense:s68908754915s
maamaagwam    VTA_TAG    "bite s.o. repeatedly" ; !line:6085, word:w5427w, sense:s68908755518s
metisin    VTA_TAG    "miss s.o., regret s.o.'s absence" ; !line:6723, word:w6018w, sense:s68908756112s
mooshkina'    VTA_TAG    "fill s.o. up" ; !line:7382, word:w6615w, sense:s68908756713s
nanagin    VTA_TAG    "hinder s.o. and break up a fight" ; !line:7849, word:w7046w, sense:s68908757145s
nisidomaam    VTA_TAG    "recognize s.o. by smell" ; !line:8518, word:w7567w, sense:s68908757730s
onjiiwe'    VTA_TAG    "fight s.o. because of such a reason" ; !line:9224, word:w8227w, sense:s68908758370s
wawiiyazhim    VTA_TAG    "joke with s.o." ; !line:9996, word:w8940w, sense:s68908759076s
wiisagendami'    VTA_TAG    "make s.o. feel pain" ; !line:10295, word:w9210w, sense:s68908759346s
zhaabwaabam    VTA_TAG    "see through s.o." ; !line:10615, word:w9495w, sense:s68908759631s
aabindam    VTA_TAG    "devour s.o.; bite s.o. cruelly" ; !line:11170, word:w72322871167w, sense:s72322874555s
LEXICON VTA_CW
aada'o    VTA_TAG    "outdo s.o." ; !line:122, word:w104w, sense:s68908750124s
bakobii'o    VTA_TAG    "put s.o. in the water" ; !line:1878, word:w1651w, sense:s68908751694s
diba'o    VTA_TAG    "pay for s.o." ; !line:3597, word:w3226w, sense:s68908753284s
maada'o    VTA_TAG    "scrape s.o." ; !line:5958, word:w5310w, sense:s68908755400s
nii'ona'o    VTA_TAG    "kill s.o." ; !line:8025, word:w7189w, sense:s68908757293s
zaka'o    VTA_TAG    "set s.o. on fire" ; !line:10548, word:w9435w, sense:s68908759570s
